Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 20 Fruits and Vegetables Generally

21-20-1.
Vegetables to be sold by weight.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to sell at retail or offer to sell at retail any lima, fava, shell, wax, or green snap beans, peas, spinach, kale, dandelions, and potatoes, and any other vegetables of the commonly accepted staple classes as may be determined by the director of environmental management, in any other manner or measure other than by weight.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1202, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-20-1

.

21-20-2.
Penalty for sales other than by weight.

Every person, firm, partnership, or corporation violating §

21-20-1

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) and not more than fifty dollars ($50.00), one-half (1/2) of the fine to the use of the city or town where the offense was committed and one-half (1/2) of the fine to the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1202, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-20-2

.

21-20-3.
Enforcement of provisions.

The enforcement of §§

21-20-1

and

21-20-2

shall be under the jurisdiction of the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1202, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-20-3

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-20-4.
Sale of nuts, beans, and berries by dry measure.

Nuts and shelled beans and all kinds of berries, whenever sold by measure, shall be sold by dry measure. And any person who shall sell any nuts or shelled beans or any kind of berries by any measure other than dry measure shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00), one-half (1/2) of the fine to the use of the town or city in which the offense shall have been committed and one-half (1/2) of the fine to the complainant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 146, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 172, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 202, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 383, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

21-20-4

.

21-20-5.
Rules as to grading, packing, and marking of farm products — False representations.

The director of environmental management is authorized and instructed to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations relative to grading, marking, labeling, packing, and branding of products of the farm. Any fruit or vegetable offered or exposed for sale or distribution in a closed or open package so packed that the faced or shown surface gives a false representation of the contents of the package shall be construed to be misbranded under the terms of this section. Products of the farm sold or offered for sale as graded, marked, labeled, packed, or branded as conforming to those rules and regulations must conform.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 33; P.L. 1926, ch. 789, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1602, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

21-20-5

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-20-6.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation who shall violate any provision of §

21-20-5

or any rule or regulation of the director of environmental management made pursuant to that section shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned for a term of three (3) months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 35; P.L. 1926, ch. 789, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1602, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

21-20-6

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-20-7.
Exemptions.

When products are grown or produced on a Rhode Island farm and sold or offered for sale at the farm, roadside stands, farmers markets or pick-your-own operations located in Rhode Island, the products may be sold or offered for sale by weight, dry measure or count, provided, that they are clearly marked as to the method of sale being used.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 188, § 1.